Utah statutes.
62A-3-106.5.   Agency responsible to investigate and provide services.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "responsible agency" means the agency
responsible to investigate or provide services in a particular case under the
rules established under Subsection (2)(a).
(2)  In order to avoid duplication in responding to a report of alleged abuse,
neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult who resides in a long-term care
facility, the division shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that establish procedures to:
(a)  determine whether Adult Protective Services or the Long-Term Care
Ombudsman Program will be responsible to investigate or provide services in a
particular case; and
(b)  determine whether, and under what circumstances, the agency described in
Subsection (2)(a) that is not the responsible agency will provide assistance
to the responsible agency in a particular case.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), or the rules made pursuant to Subsection
(2), Adult Protective Services shall be the agency within the division that is
responsible for receiving all reports of alleged abuse, neglect, or
exploitation of a vulnerable adult as provided in Section 62A-3-305.
